California, session 20252026, AB365.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Justin Kropp Safety Act.SEC. 2. Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 8310) is added to Division 4.1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: CHAPTER 1.5. Worksite Automated External Defibrillators8310. (a) Each utility, and independent contractor or subcontractor of a utility, shall do both of the following:(1) Have an automated external defibrillator (AED) available for emergency use at each worksite where two or more electrical utility workers are performing work on electrical transmission or distribution lines of 601 volts or more.(2) Adopt, consistent with its duty to furnish and use safety devices and safeguards as required by Section 6401 of the Labor Code and as part of its injury prevention program that conforms to the requirements of Section 6401.7 of the Labor Code, a written program of policies and procedures to ensure both of the following:(A) Any person who renders emergency care or treatment to a person in cardiac arrest by using an AED shall activate the emergency medical services system as soon as possible and report the use of the AED to the local EMS agency.(B) All employees, contractors, and subcontractors shall be trained on the use of an AED and the procedures to be followed in the event of an emergency, including, but not limited to, the requirement to activate the emergency medical services system as soon as possible and report the use of the AED to the local EMS agency.(b) Each utility, and independent contractor or subcontractor of a utility, shall comply with the requirements of Section 1797.196 of the Health and Safety Code.(c) A person who, in good faith and not for compensation, renders emergency care or treatment by the use of an AED is not liable for civil damages resulting from any acts or omissions of the person rendering the emergency care as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code.(d) A utility or an independent contractor or subcontractor of a utility that acquires an AED for emergency use, makes reasonable efforts to comply with the requirements of subdivision (a), and complies with subdivision (b), is not liable for any civil damages resulting from the emergency use of the AED as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code.(e) A person who renders emergency treatment by means of an AED and is not compensated for doing so, but receives compensation for other actions as a result of their unrelated employment, does not render emergency medical care “for compensation.” (f) Subdivisions (c) and (d) do not apply in cases described in subdivision (e) of Section 1714.21 of the Civil Code.(g) For purposes of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Electrical cooperative” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2776. (2) “Electrical corporation” has the same meaning as defined in Section 218.(3) “Local EMS agency” means an agency described in Section 1797.200 of the Health and Safety Code. (4) “Local publicly owned electric utility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 224.3.(5) “Utility” means an electrical corporation, electrical cooperative, or local publicly owned electric utility.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.